Oklahoma, session 2025, SB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 516, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 516. A. Except as provided in subsection B of this
section, the probation and parole officer shall, upon information
sufficient to give the officer reasonable grounds to believe that
the parolee has violated the terms of and conditions of parole,
notify the Department of Corrections. If it is determined that the
facts justify revocation action, the Department shall issue a
warrant for the arrest of the parolee and the warrant shall have the
force and effect of any warrant of arrest issued by a district court
in this state. The parolee shall, after arrest, be immediately
incarcerated in the nearest county jail, intermediate sanctions
facility, or a Department of Corrections facility to await action by
the Governor or the Pardon and Parole Board as to whether the parole
will be revoked. Parole time shall cease to run after the issuance
of a warrant for arrest by the Department of Corrections, and earned
credits shall not be accrued during any period of time when the
parolee is incarcerated pending revocation action by the Governor or
the Pardon and Parole Board. Pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection:

1. The Governor shall have the power and authority to revoke
parole granted by the Governor and file the certificate of
revocation with the Secretary of State; and
2. The Pardon and Parole Board, by majority vote, shall have
the power and authority to revoke parole granted by the Pardon and
Parole Board and file the certificate of revocation with the
Secretary of State.
B. Any parolee determined to have violated any terms or
conditions of parole by the supervising parole officer may be given
the option, at the discretion of the Department of Corrections, to
be placed in an intermediate sanctions facility for disciplinary
sanction and programmatic services in lieu of revocation or when
revocation action by the Governor or the Pardon and Parole Board is
deemed unnecessary for the nature of the violation. Any parolee for
whom a warrant for arrest issues as provided in subsection A of this
section may, at the discretion of the Department or the Governor, be
placed in an intermediate sanctions facility pending or following
any action by the Governor or the Pardon and Parole Board as to
revocation of parole or required additional conditions to remain on
parole. A parolee may be received and processed into the custody of
the Department on an expedited basis through any facility serving
such purpose or may be processed directly by the intermediate
sanctions facility.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 76 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 27th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 76 Page 3